epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/is.xml
	<patterns>
		.að3
		.aða4
		.aðk2
		.aðl4a
		.af3n
		.af3re
		.afr3í
		.af1s4
		.agn5ú
		.al3e
		.al4l
		.am4s
		.an3k
		.ann4e
		.ar2
		.ar3a4b5
		.arth5
		.asp3
		.aum5a
		.ám4
		.án4a
		.ba4
		.da4
		.dam5a
		.dav3
		.dr4
		.ds4
		.du4
		.dust5
		.ed5ik
		.eftir5
		.eigin5g
		.eink4
		.ekt4
		.er4m
		.eyf2
		.fa4
		.fi4
		.fjár3
		.fl4
		.fla4
		.fr4
		.frá1
		.ga2
		.gar4
		.gas5l
		.gd4
		.gem5
		.gja2
		.gl2
		.gr4
		.gu4
		.her5sk
		.il4
		.ingj5
		.is4m
		.ís1l
		.ja2
		.jar4
		.ka4
		.kal5e
		.kam5e
		.kapí3
		.kart5
		.kast3
		.kn4
		.kr4
		.kur4
		.la4
		.lag5e
		.leik5sv
		.líb5
		.lu4
		.ma2
		.maj5
		.mak5r
		.mi4
		.mj4
		.mu4
		.mynst4
		.na2
		.ní5f
		.ný5f
		.ol4íu.
		.óa4
		.óð5al
		.óf4
		.óg2
		.ók4
		.óm4i
		.ós2
		.pa4
		.pl4
		.ra2
		.ram4
		.rí4
		.róð4
		.rúm3
		.saman5
		.sk4
		.ski4
		.skj4
		.skr4
		.sl2
		.sm4
		.smá3l
		.sn4
		.snar5a
		.sp4
		.spr4
		.st4
		.sta2
		.ta4
		.ti2
		.til3
		.tí5f
		.tr4
		.tu2
		.tví1
		.ung3l
		.unn5usta
		.úr1
		.út1
		.út5s
		.vegg5s
		.vist3
		.yfir3
		.ævi3s
		.öfl3
		.ögr5
		.ör3s
		.öt3u
		2a3a4
		a4ab
		a4ad
		2a1á2
		2a1b
		ab4a
		3abís
		a5by
		abæk4l
		4ac
		2a1d4
		a5dó
		a4du
		1að
		4aðað
		að3al
		að3ar
		2aðfa
		4aðfö
		að3g
		að3i
		2aðl
		að4li
		4að2m
		2aðsh
		3aðu.
		2aðv
		2a1e
		a5ei
		a4es
		2af
		af3ald
		af3arn
		a3fá
		af4fr
		af3g
		a1fj
		a3fló
		a1flu
		af5ork
		a1fr
		af3ré
		afr4u
		a5fræ
		4afsd
		af1sk
		4afsso
		af2u
		a1ful
		a1fun
		3afurð
		2ag
		a3gau
		ag5ál
		ag5is
		a5gj
		agn4ara
		ag2ne
		ag5ot
		a1gr
		ag4ra
		ags4ið
		ag4sp
		ag4stj
		ag4ul
		ag3æð
		4a1h
		4ai
		a3ið
		a4in
		aí4h
		2aj
		a3jö
		2ak
		akaup4s
		a5ká
		a1ke
		a5kinnin
		a5kistu
		a1kj
		ak5rei
		aks4l
		4akss
		ak3u
		a3kv
		a5ky
		a5ký
		a3kö
		2al
		a1lag
		4aland
		a5landið
		a5landinu
		alas4
		alá4
		a4lem
		al3er
		al1f
		al1g
		5alge
		3alh
		alis4
		al4ín
		al3kj
		alk5s
		al3k2u
		al4lí
		all2s
		allst4
		al4lý
		4almað
		al5mann
		al5m2i
		a3log
		a5lok
		al5op
		a5lóð
		al4sæt
		al5up
		al5ú
		al3v4
		a3ly
		a1læ
		a1lö
		2am
		am3ang
		a3mann
		am3ari
		am3ars
		am3a4s
		am3dr
		a3mí
		am3k
		am2m
		amm4is
		a1mó
		am3se
		ams2i
		am1t
		1an
		3an.
		3ana.
		an3ada
		4anag
		2anal
		4anau
		2aná
		4and.
		and1e
		4an4dí
		andr4
		4andö
		4ane
		an5ei
		2ang
		an4ga
		ang1d
		an4gj
		ang5spi
		an2g3ö
		4anib
		4anið
		an5ín
		2ank
		ank5l
		ank3v
		3anm
		ann5d
		4annf
		4annh
		ann1k
		4annl
		4anns
		annsk4
		4an4o
		anst4
		an3sti
		an3tí
		3anu
		4anú
		4aný
		4anæ
		4anö
		2a3o
		2a3ó
		2ap
		ap3al
		a3per
		a3pil
		a3po
		a5pre
		ap3te
		a5p4un
		a5pör
		1ar
		3ar.
		ar3afu
		ara5kr
		ar3ang
		4arani
		ar4arp
		ar2as
		ar5ast.
		ar3au
		2ará4
		4aráð
		5ar3ák
		3ar3ár
		3ar1ás
		ar1át
		3ard2
		4ardí
		4arð.
		arðar5á
		4arði
		4arðs
		3arðu.
		2are
		3ar1ef
		4aref.
		5areig
		5arein
		a3rek
		ar3el
		ar3en
		ar5er
		a3ret
		4a1ré
		2arf
		3arfe
		3arfé
		arfs3k
		ar1fu
		ar3gj
		ar4græ
		args4
		arg3sl
		4ar5ið
		4arif
		ar3in
		ar4ind
		ar5ist.
		4a5rit
		4a1rí
		ar3j4
		4ark.
		ark4is
		ar5kj
		ar3kr4
		4arms
		ar3mú
		4arna.
		4aroð
		4arol
		4arot
		2aró
		2arp
		4arra
		arr2i
		arr4u
		ar4sá
		3arse
		ar1sk
		ar4spi
		arst4
		5arstí
		ar3su
		ar5til
		artr2
		ar5trað
		ar3u
		ar4uð
		4ar4ug
		5arum
		2ar1ú
		a5rús
		ar3v4
		ar3yf
		4arý
		2aræ
		a3ræð
		ar5æv
		4arö
		as2
		4a1sa
		as3an
		2a3sá
		4ase
		4asé
		2asi
		a5sinna
		2asj
		4a1sk
		2asl
		a3slag
		2a1sm
		4asn
		4aso
		4asó
		2asp
		aspít4
		4ass
		ass4v
		1ast
		4astað
		ast4and
		4astau
		4aste
		4asté
		4astig
		4astin
		ast4ing
		4astirð
		4a1stí
		4astj
		ast3l
		4asto
		2astó
		4astrá
		ast5ráð
		4astrí
		4a3stræ
		4aströ
		4astul
		4a3st4un
		4astú
		4a3sty
		4astæ
		4astö
		2a1su
		2a1sv
		4as4y
		2asý
		4asæ
		2asö
		2at
		at3að
		a3tak
		a3tal
		at4anv
		ata4r
		a1te
		at3ey
		3ath
		a1til
		a3tj
		3atk
		atns3
		a4tó
		atr4a
		at1re
		3at1ri
		at2sp
		a5t2un
		a1tú
		at4ve
		3atvi
		a1tö
		2a4u2
		4auð.
		auð5li
		5auðn
		aug4as
		au4m
		aum5ba
		aum5un
		aun5dr
		aup5e
		aup3l
		a5upp
		au4s
		ausa5m
		au4t
		2a1ú
		2a1v
		av4ar.
		a3vir
		2ay
		a5yf
		4az
		2a1þ
		a2þó
		2a3æ
		4a5ö
		á1a
		áak4
		áa5lo
		á1b
		á4bu
		á1d4
		4áð
		áð2s
		áð3sn
		áð3sta
		áð2u
		áð3us
		á1e
		áf2
		á5fá
		á5fí
		á3fl
		áflæð4
		áf5un
		ág2i
		ágl4
		ágr2
		ág1s
		ág3v
		á1h
		á1i
		ák2a
		ákam4
		ákap4
		ákó4
		ála3m
		ál3arf
		ál2as
		á5lau
		á3let
		álf3d4
		álf5sk
		ál4m
		álm5an
		álm5u
		álp3
		ál4se
		ál5sva
		ál5ug
		á5lú
		ál3æð
		2ám
		ámál5a
		ámsl4
		á2n
		án4aro
		án2as
		án4o
		á3ný
		5ánæ
		á3o
		4áp
		ára5g
		ár3an
		árar4
		á5ré
		ár3f4
		ár5g
		ár5k4
		ár1m
		árns4
		árn5sl
		ár2st
		ár5t
		ár1u
		ár3v
		á5ræ
		ás5en
		á1sk
		á2ska
		á4ske
		á3s4l
		ás2m
		ást2
		ást5i
		ást5ráð
		ást5rík
		ást5v
		4ásu4
		ás5va
		át3að
		á1te
		átr4as
		áttar3
		5áttin.
		átt3un
		á1tæ
		á1u
		áuk4
		á3ve
		á3ví
		á1væ
		á1þ
		á5æð
		b2a
		4ba.
		baðk4
		ba4h
		bak5sl
		ba2n
		4bana
		4baní
		bank5an
		4bans
		b5ant
		bar2b
		barð4as
		bar2n
		bá4s
		2b4b
		bb3að
		bb3an
		bb5arn
		bb3i
		bb3uð
		1be
		bess4
		b2i2
		bið5i
		bið5lis
		bið5r4
		bif1
		bilj5
		bill5
		4binn
		bisk3
		b4it
		bit2a
		4bía
		2b3ís
		2b3íu
		3bj
		bjar2
		b4l2
		bl4íunn
		4bn
		5bo
		3bó4
		bók3s
		b4r2
		br5að
		bra4s
		3bro
		br4u
		3brú
		4bum4
		bur2
		3burð
		burst5að
		bu4s
		1bú
		búf4
		bú3sta
		1by
		1bý
		bæk2i
		bæn4a
		1bær
		b5ættism
		1bö
		4böki
		c4a
		ci4
		ck4
		4da.
		daf4
		dak2
		3dal.
		5dals
		da1m4
		d5ang
		d4aní
		d4arad
		d4ar4að
		dar4ár
		d3arf
		d5arp
		dask4
		da3sl
		4dav
		d1b
		2dd
		4dea
		d5ef
		3deg
		1deil
		d1en
		d5eó
		5dep
		d1f4
		d1g2
		d4gi
		d1h
		d1i
		di5fu
		d3ill
		dim4
		di3ma
		di3nav
		d2ine
		dir3s
		dí3d
		d5íð
		d5ínu
		3dís
		dív3
		3dj4
		djarf5a
		d1k2
		d1l2
		d2la
		dl3að
		d3lag
		d3lau
		d4lið
		dl3u
		d1m
		d5olf
		d5óð
		d3óf
		dó5lí
		1dó2m
		dóm5an
		dó5ne
		3dór
		dó2s
		dós5e
		4dq
		d5raðf
		dr4aðs5
		d5raðst
		drafn4
		dr4ara
		3dreg
		d5reip
		d5rey
		d5riða
		d3rík
		d5roð
		dru4
		d4ræt
		2ds
		d5sal
		d4sjö
		dsk2
		ds4ko
		ds5kun
		ds1l
		d5snö
		ds1s4
		d1st4
		d4sti
		ds4uð
		d4söf
		d1t2
		d1u
		duf4
		5duft
		duk4
		d4umb
		du5ræ
		d4usta
		d3ún
		dún4a
		dút4
		d1v4
		4dw
		1dy
		1dý
		d3þ
		1dæ
		4dæf
		4dær
		3dö
		ð1a
		ðaf4
		ða3g
		ðak4
		ð4albo
		ð3ald
		ðal4is
		ð4a1m4
		ð3a4n
		ðanmeg4
		ðar1a
		ð3ar3f
		ðar3l
		ðar4lis
		ðar3t4
		ð3arú
		ðat4a
		ð3au
		ð3á2
		ð1b
		ð1d2
		ð1e
		ð3f4
		ð1g
		ð2ga
		ð2gi
		ðg4l
		ð4gn
		ðgu4
		ð3g4ul
		ð1h
		ð1i
		ði3g
		ðik4
		ð3in
		ðis5l
		ðist4
		ð4ista
		ðis4ve
		ðj3as
		ð3jó
		ð4ju
		ð3ke
		ð1kr
		ðk2un
		ð3kunn
		ð1kv
		ð1lá
		ðl2in
		ðl4ist
		ð3lí
		ðl4ur
		ð1læ
		ð1m2
		ðnum4
		ð3o
		ð3ó
		ð1p2
		ðr5át
		ð1re
		ð1ré
		ð3rik
		ð3rík
		ð5ró
		ðr1u
		ð3rú
		ð1ræ
		ðræðis5
		ðs5afl
		ðs5á
		ð4seg
		ðs4inn
		ð1sk
		ðskr4
		ð4skú
		ðs5kv
		ð4skö
		ðs4lu
		ð2so
		ðs3or
		ðss4
		ð1st2
		ð2stí
		ð3stö
		ðs4u
		ð4svi
		ð2sæ
		ð1t4
		ð1u
		ð3uð
		ð3ug
		ð3ull
		ð5uls
		ð5unn
		ð3unu
		ð3ur
		ður5á
		ður3f
		ður5g4
		ður5st
		ð1v
		ðv5að
		ðv3ann
		ðv3arn
		ð1y
		ð5ý
		ð1þ
		eat4
		ebr5e
		ed4e
		e1dik
		ed3it
		eð3a2
		eðal1
		eð3il
		eð4is
		e2f
		e3fal
		ef3i
		efj5an
		ef4n
		4eft.
		2efts5
		eg4ge
		eg3i
		egr5u
		eg3u4l
		egur4s
		e4i
		eið5ar
		eið4st
		eif4as
		ei4ka
		eik3li
		eik3u
		eil3ag
		eil5ö
		ei2m
		eim5u
		eing4
		1eink
		4eino
		eist5að
		e4k
		ek2is
		ekj5a
		ekn3
		ek3u
		ek5ú
		e2l
		el5ás
		el4d
		el3eg
		elf3in
		el4gr
		el1i
		4elí
		el3ín
		el4ke
		el2l
		ell5an
		ell3e
		elleg4
		el3ó
		el3r
		el1sí
		5elsk
		el4te
		elu5s
		e2m
		em4ba
		1embe
		em5ens
		em3i4
		emj3
		em4l
		eml2i
		empl5
		em5u
		e2n
		4enc
		en4g
		eng3a
		enik4
		2enn
		enn4t
		en4t
		ep4h
		ep3i
		epl5i
		e4pr
		ep4t
		e4r
		er3al
		er5au
		er5á
		4erð
		5ere
		er5et
		erf5ar
		er2fr
		erf3u
		erg5l
		er4gr
		er3i
		er2k
		er4la
		erl3i
		er4lí
		er4mi
		erm5in
		er5ól
		er5skj
		er1un
		er2v
		er3ö
		eröf4
		e2s
		es3a
		es4ban
		es4bu
		4esj
		e5ske
		4eso
		esp3a
		es2s
		est3að
		est5ö
		e3sæ
		etik4
		et5ils
		etna4
		et5o
		etr5an
		etr3u
		etul4
		et2us
		ext4u
		5eyrar
		é3b
		é1d
		éð2s
		é3fe
		é1g4
		é5ky
		é1l
		éla4g
		él4ara
		é2li
		é4lj
		él3r
		ér1
		ér4á
		ér4r
		érs4
		ér4un
		ér3v
		é3sm
		étt4ug
		ét4un
		étur4
		f3að
		fa2g
		fa5k
		1fall
		fal4u
		fa4ná
		fa5p4
		f2ar
		f3arð
		f4are
		f4arg
		farka5l
		f3arl
		fast3e
		fá3f
		f5áns
		fá3rá
		fá3ta
		fá3v
		f1b4
		fd2an
		f1dr
		f5dú
		fða4l
		1fe
		f3ef
		f3ein
		3fel
		f3end
		ferl5i
		fer3t
		f1ey
		1fé
		f4fa
		f2fo
		f1fr
		ff4st
		ffær4a
		f1g2
		f2ga
		f2gi
		fg4n
		f1h
		f3ið
		fik4
		f5il.
		f5ili
		f3ill
		f5ils
		f5ilv
		fim3a
		f4ine
		f3inu
		3firði
		f3irðu
		firg2
		f3irn
		1firs
		3f4isk
		fi5so
		f3ist.
		f3istu
		fis5v
		fí4
		f5íkv
		f3ís
		fj4a
		fj5aðu
		fj5ann
		fj4e
		f1k2
		fl3and
		fl4at
		3flata
		f5lát
		f4len
		fl5g
		1flo
		5flut
		flv4
		4flý
		1flö
		f1m
		4fn
		fn1g
		f5n4í
		fn3k
		fn5ok
		1fo
		4fop
		forf4
		fork4
		1fó
		fr2
		4fra.
		fr3að
		fra4m
		fram3l
		fr5and
		4frar
		2fri.
		fr5in
		frí5m4
		f3róf
		fru4
		fr3uð
		1fræ
		2f3ræk
		4fræn
		fs3á
		f4sel
		f4skaf
		fsl4
		fs3li
		fs5na
		f2so
		fs5or
		fsr4
		fss4
		f4sti
		f5s4tæ
		fs1v
		f4sæ
		ft3að
		fta4sk
		ft5á
		f3te
		ft2s
		fts5l
		ft3u
		ft4ul
		f1u
		4fu.
		f3uð
		3fugl
		fund4as
		2f3ur
		5furðul
		fur5e
		furs4
		fur3t
		4f2us
		f5ust.
		f3ustu
		f1v4
		1fy
		f3yrt
		f1þ
		1fæ
		1fö
		för4l
		g1a
		4ga.
		4g3að
		gaf4ar
		gagl4
		3gagn
		gak4
		ga4lag
		gal4is
		5gals
		5galt
		gam3al
		gam4i
		g5and
		1gang
		gap4a
		g4ard.
		g2arð
		3garð.
		3garða
		3garði
		3garð4s
		5garður
		g3ar3f
		gar4kl
		gar3l
		gar3t
		4gas
		g4as.
		g4así
		g3ast.
		ga5stað
		1gata
		gat4r
		gá2
		3gáf
		gá5le
		g1b
		gd4ans
		g3de
		g4du
		gd4v
		gð4aro
		1ge
		3gei
		2g1el
		gen4
		g5end
		3geng
		g3ent
		5gerð
		ger5í
		germ4
		gerv5a
		get3r
		g1f2
		ggis5
		ggjaf3
		ggj5ar
		gg5rá
		gg3ræ
		ggs4v
		gg3ug
		gg2v
		g4gö
		g1h
		g1i
		4gi.
		4gik
		gi5kv
		3gild
		g5ill
		5gilt
		gim4a
		4g3i4n
		gis4a
		g4isp
		g5istæ
		gír5a
		gís4
		gjaf5ar
		gjaf5o
		gjak4
		gjal4
		gj4asta
		1gjö
		g1k4
		gkal4
		g1lá
		g4leð
		g3leg
		gl5é
		gl3f2
		g3lit
		g5lín
		gl3ót
		glsk4
		3glugg
		glu3s
		gl4y
		g3lær
		g1m4
		gnap4
		gnart4
		g4ná
		gn3g
		g3nó
		gn4se
		gn5ug
		g4ný.
		3gol
		g3or
		3góð
		gór5
		gó4ur
		g1p
		g3rak4
		gr4an
		gra2s
		gras5sv
		g2rá
		1grei
		g3reis
		g5reyð
		gr2i
		2gri.
		grið4
		g3rík
		3gró
		3grund
		3grunn
		g3ræði
		g2ræn
		4gs
		gs1á
		g4sei
		gsk4
		gs4len
		gsl2u
		gs4lö
		gs3m
		gs5or
		gs3s4
		gs4si
		gs1v
		gt3að
		g3te
		gt4s
		2g1u
		g4uði
		guðl4
		5g2uðs
		guð4só
		g3uðu
		5gufu
		gu4lagi
		g5ulin
		g3ull
		g3uls
		gu5mið
		g3un
		gurf4
		gur3g
		g4usta
		g3ú
		gúst5a
		g1v
		g2va
		g3val
		5gyð
		g1þ
		1gæ
		gæð4as
		gæl4
		gær3
		1gö4
		h2a4
		4ha.
		hað4
		haf4sp
		hand5r
		hat3r
		há3g
		hál4
		há3re
		há4ski
		há5sta
		hás4u
		hát4
		há5ti
		hátr4
		há1v
		he4
		hei2
		hellis5
		hen2r
		herk4
		her3l4
		hersk4
		4hersla
		hey5st
		4hg
		h4i
		hig4
		him5b
		hin4
		hit4as
		hit4n
		2hí2
		h5ía
		hí5b
		hj4
		h2l2
		4hl.
		4hls
		hlu4
		h4n2
		hnja4
		hnjá3l
		holl3u
		horm5
		hó2
		hóm5e
		hót3
		hr4
		4hs
		hu4
		hug1r
		hug3u
		hul5i
		hundr4
		hú2
		húm3
		4húr
		hús5k
		hv4
		hvar4
		hvik3
		5hy
		hæf5a
		hætt4us
		höst3
		2ia
		i5as
		4i5á
		4i1b
		ibb3
		ibl3í
		4ic
		2id4
		i3da
		i1de
		i3dr
		1ið.
		4iðf
		2ið3g
		ið5jarð
		4iðr
		4iðs
		ið5sal
		2iðu
		4ie
		i3ef
		4if
		if5arn
		ifat4
		i2fen
		if4g
		if3is
		if4t
		i4fy
		4i2g
		iga3m
		igð5u
		ig1en
		ig5rí
		2i1h
		2ii
		i5ið
		4ij
		4ik
		ik5á
		ik3i
		ik4is
		ikt5o
		i4kvö
		2il
		ila2g
		il4ara
		i1lá
		4ile
		ilf4a
		il1fi
		il1g4
		i5liðu
		il5in
		il3ip
		il5ís
		ilí4um
		il4kv
		il3lag
		ill5an
		il3lá
		i1lo
		il4sa
		il1sk
		il3sn
		ilst4
		ilæk4
		i5lön
		4im
		im4b
		imb3u
		im3i
		im4ið
		im4la
		im4m
		i5mó
		im4sv
		1i2n
		4inaf
		in3an
		4inar
		inat5r
		2i3nau
		2ina2v
		inav3í
		4iná
		4ind.
		in4ga
		ingj6arni
		4ingr
		ingv4
		2inns
		2innu
